Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.801

Administration—2023 c 73.

The state board is instructed to administer chapter 73, Laws of 2023 in a way that neither reduces benefits, nor grants additional benefits, for members or beneficiaries of the plan.

[ 2023 c 73 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 73: See note following RCW 41.24.800.